Hawaii statutes.
[§346-366] Time limits. To the extent
that appropriations are made available, a provider agency shall provide shelter
or any other program assistance authorized by this part to eligible homeless
families and homeless individuals not later than three days after a vacancy
occurs, or such time as is set by rule, which shall not be later than seven
days after they apply and qualify for the shelter or other program assistance. These
time limits may be waived at the discretion of the department for a maximum period
of fourteen days for the purpose of implementing repairs to the subject shelter
that the department deems major or extensive. [L 2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next